Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202120-131.04
Service animal; access to housing accommodations; terms and conditions.

Every person with a disability who has a service animal or obtains a service animal shall have full and equal access to all housing accommodations with such animal as prescribed in sections 20-131.01 to 20-131.04. Such person shall not be required to pay extra compensation for such animal. Such person shall be liable for any damage done to such premises by such animal. Any person who rents, leases, or provides housing accommodations for compensation to any person with a disability who has or obtains a service animal shall not charge an additional deposit for such animal.

Laws 1975, LB 83, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 932, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 254, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB806, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB248, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 11.